Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.095

False advertising—Injunctions.

If any person violates the provisions of this chapter, the attorney general, prosecuting attorney, the secretary, the board, or any citizen of the same county, may maintain an action in the name of the state to enjoin such person from practicing or holding himself or herself out as practicing physical therapy. The injunction shall not relieve criminal prosecution but the remedy by injunction shall be in addition to the liability of such offender for criminal prosecution and the suspension or revocation of his or her license.

[ 1991 c 3 s 182; 1983 c 116 s 19; 1961 c 64 s 9.]